Vermont, session 2025-2026, H431.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. EXPANDED ACCESS TO CATASTROPHIC PLANS; WAIVER
On or before January 1, 2026, the Secretary of Human Services shall apply
to the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services for a waiver to expand
eligibility for catastrophic health plans authorized under 42 U.S.C. § 18002(e)
to individuals who have not attained 40 years of age prior to the beginning of
the plan year.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380499 v.1